Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.100

Audits—Purpose.

(1) The director shall conduct audits of the cattle received, fed, handled, and shipped by the licensee at each certified feed lot. These audits shall be for the purpose of determining if the cattle correlate with the inspection certificates issued in their behalf and that the certificate of assurance furnished the director by the licensee correlates with his or her assurance that inspected cattle were not commingled with uninspected cattle.

(2) The department shall conduct an audit to determine compliance with RCW 16.36.150 at the time of conducting audits under subsection (1) of this section.

[ 2011 c 204 s 4; 2003 c 326 s 54; 1979 c 81 s 3; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.